Washington statutes.
RCW 10.32.050

Tribal fugitive—Criminal prosecution pending. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

If a criminal prosecution has been instituted against a tribal fugitive under the laws of this state or any political subdivision thereof and is still pending, extradition on a tribal court request under RCW 10.32.030 through 10.32.090 shall be placed on hold until the tribal fugitive's release from a place of detention, unless otherwise agreed upon in any given case.

[ 2024 c 207 s 6.]